Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1762.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-NIN-STATE TUITION FOR PENNSYLVANIA RESIDENTSSection 2001-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 "Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college under Article XIX-A.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(3) A State-related institution as defined in section 1502-A.Section 2002-N. Requirements.An individual shall be exempt from paying the out-of-State tuition rate at a public institution of higher education in this Commonwealth if the individual has been a resident of Pennsylvania for at least 12 months and enters as a student in the public institution of higher education in this Commonwealth not earlier than the 2025 fall semester.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1762PN2172 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516